Rhode Island, session 2025, SB295.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 42 of the General Laws entitled "STATE AFFAIRS AND
GOVERNMENT" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 167
DETENTION FOR FEDERAL CIVIL IMMIGRATION VIOLATIONS
42-167-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Detention for Federal Civil
Immigration Violations”.
42-167-2. Prohibition on agreements to detain individuals for federal civil
immigration violations.
(a) No state or municipal government official or body, or instrumentality or agency thereof,
may enter into, renew, or otherwise agree, to be a party to any contract or agreement, that is or will
be used to detain individuals for federal civil immigration violations including, but not limited to,
any intergovernmental services agreements to detain individuals for federal civil immigration
violations or any lease or other agreement, that facilitates the use of real property belonging to the
public body, or instrumentality or agency thereof, to detain and relocate individuals for federal civil
immigration violations.
(b) A state or municipal governmental official or body, or instrumentality or agency
thereof, that is party to any existing agreement, that is or will be used to detain individuals for

federal civil immigration violations, shall exercise the termination provision of the agreement as
applied to its use for detaining individuals for federal civil immigration violations no later than July
1, 2025.
42-167-3. Severability.
If any clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part of this chapter shall be adjudge by any
court of competent jurisdiction to be unconstitutional or otherwise invalid, that judgment shall not
affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder of this chapter, but shall be confined in its operation to
the clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part directly involved in the controversy in which that
judgment shall have been rendered.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001290
========
LC001290 - Page 2 of 3